Mississippi, session 2026, HB1148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the governing authorities of the City of Carthage, Mississippi, to assist in paying costs associated with certain programs and projects for the Carthage Police Department as described in Section 2 of this act for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027....................................................... ................................................... $ 430,000.00 SECTION 2.  The money appropriated by Section 1 of this act shall be used by the governing authorities of Carthage for the following programs and projects for the Carthage Police Department: (a)  Crime prevention programs............. $ 325,000.00 (i)  Acquiring, installing and operating license plate readers and live cameras in and around the city, focusing on high crime areas, high traffic areas, public parks and schools; and (ii)  Acquiring and using the Evidence IQ device, which can test spent cartridges from crime scenes against other spent cartridges to determine patterns and/or weapons used. (b)  Police vehicles - purchasing two (2) Dodge Durango SUVs equipped with light bars, cages and radios........... $ 105,000.00 TOTAL.............................................. $ 430,000.00 SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.